isv_lat_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX CI Y 71
SFX CI ti l .
SFX CI ti la .
SFX CI ti lo .
SFX CI ti li .
SFX CI ti u .
SFX CI gti žem .
SFX CI gti žeš .
SFX CI gti že .
SFX CI gti žemo .
SFX CI gti žete .
SFX CI ti ut .
SFX CI gti žeh .
SFX CI gti žeše .
SFX CI gti žehmo .
SFX CI gti žeste .
SFX CI gti žehu .
SFX CI gti ži .
SFX CI gti žimo .
SFX CI gti žite .
SFX CI ti uči .
SFX CI ti učego .
SFX CI ti učemu .
SFX CI ti učim .
SFX CI ti učem .
SFX CI ti učih .
SFX CI ti učimi .
SFX CI ti uča .
SFX CI ti uču .
SFX CI ti učej .
SFX CI ti učeju .
SFX CI ti uče .
SFX CI gti žemy .
SFX CI gti žemogo .
SFX CI gti žemomu .
SFX CI gti žemym .
SFX CI gti žemom .
SFX CI gti žemo .
SFX CI gti žema .
SFX CI gti žemu .
SFX CI gti žemoj .
SFX CI gti žemoju .
SFX CI gti žemi .
SFX CI gti žeme .
SFX CI gti žemyh .
SFX CI gti žemym .
SFX CI gti žemymi .
SFX CI ti ši .
SFX CI ti ša .
SFX CI ti še .
SFX CI gti ženy .
SFX CI gti ženogo .
SFX CI gti ženomu .
SFX CI gti ženym .
SFX CI gti ženom .
SFX CI gti ženi .
SFX CI gti žene .
SFX CI gti ženyh .
SFX CI gti ženymi .
SFX CI gti žena .
SFX CI gti ženu .
SFX CI gti ženoj .
SFX CI gti ženoju .
SFX CI gti ženo .
SFX CI gti ženje .
SFX CI gti ženja .
SFX CI gti ženju .
SFX CI gti ženjem .
SFX CI gti ženij .
SFX CI gti ženjam .
SFX CI gti ženjami .
SFX CI gti ženjah .

SFX CJ Y 4
SFX CJ es sa .
SFX CJ es su .
SFX CJ es som .
SFX CJ es se .

SFX CK Y 12
SFX CK 0 e .
SFX CK 0 a .
SFX CK 0 ego .
SFX CK 0 u .
SFX CK 0 ej .
SFX CK 0 em .
SFX CK 0 emu .
SFX CK 0 im .
SFX CK 0 eju .
SFX CK 0 i .
SFX CK 0 ih .
SFX CK 0 imi .

SFX CL Y 62
SFX CL ti l .
SFX CL ti la .
SFX CL ti lo .
SFX CL ti li .
SFX CL lěti elju .
SFX CL lěti eljem .
SFX CL lěti elješ .
SFX CL lěti elje .
SFX CL lěti eljemo .
SFX CL lěti eljete .
SFX CL lěti eljut .
SFX CL ti h .
SFX CL ti še .
SFX CL ti hmo .
SFX CL ti ste .
SFX CL ti hu .
SFX CL lěti elj .
SFX CL lěti eljmo .
SFX CL lěti eljte .
SFX CL lěti eljuči .
SFX CL lěti eljučego .
SFX CL lěti eljučemu .
SFX CL lěti eljučim .
SFX CL lěti eljučem .
SFX CL lěti eljučih .
SFX CL lěti eljučimi .
SFX CL lěti eljuča .
SFX CL lěti eljuču .
SFX CL lěti eljučej .
SFX CL lěti eljučeju .
SFX CL lěti eljuče .
SFX CL lěti eljemy .
SFX CL lěti eljemogo .
SFX CL lěti eljemomu .
SFX CL lěti eljemym .
SFX CL lěti eljemom .
SFX CL lěti eljemo .
SFX CL lěti eljema .
SFX CL lěti eljemu .
SFX CL lěti eljemoj .
SFX CL lěti eljemoju .
SFX CL lěti eljemi .
SFX CL lěti eljeme .
SFX CL lěti eljemyh .
SFX CL lěti eljemym .
SFX CL lěti eljemymi .
SFX CL ti vši .
SFX CL ti všego .
SFX CL ti všemu .
SFX CL ti všim .
SFX CL ti všem .
SFX CL ti vših .
SFX CL ti všimi .
SFX CL ti vša .
SFX CL ti všu .
SFX CL ti všej .
SFX CL ti všeju .
SFX CL ti vše .
SFX CL i y .
SFX CL i a .
SFX CL i o .
SFX CL i je .

SFX CM Y 9
SFX CM a e .
SFX CM a u .
SFX CM ja ej .
SFX CM a i .
SFX CM 0 h .
SFX CM 0 m .
SFX CM a eju .
SFX CM 0 mi .
SFX CM a o .

SFX CN Y 9
SFX CN a y .
SFX CN a u .
SFX CN la ol .
SFX CN a ě .
SFX CN 0 h .
SFX CN 0 m .
SFX CN a oju .
SFX CN 0 mi .
SFX CN a o .

SFX CO Y 53
SFX CO eti l .
SFX CO eti la .
SFX CO eti lo .
SFX CO eti li .
SFX CO eti u .
SFX CO ti m .
SFX CO ti š .
SFX CO ti 0 .
SFX CO ti mo .
SFX CO i e .
SFX CO eti ut .
SFX CO ti h .
SFX CO ti še .
SFX CO ti hmo .
SFX CO ti ste .
SFX CO ti hu .
SFX CO eti i .
SFX CO eti imo .
SFX CO eti ite .
SFX CO eti uči .
SFX CO eti učego .
SFX CO eti učemu .
SFX CO eti učim .
SFX CO eti učem .
SFX CO eti učih .
SFX CO eti učimi .
SFX CO eti uča .
SFX CO eti uču .
SFX CO eti učej .
SFX CO eti učeju .
SFX CO eti uče .
SFX CO ti my .
SFX CO ti mogo .
SFX CO ti momu .
SFX CO ti mym .
SFX CO ti mom .
SFX CO ti mo .
SFX CO ti ma .
SFX CO ti mu .
SFX CO ti moj .
SFX CO ti moju .
SFX CO ti mi .
SFX CO ti me .
SFX CO ti myh .
SFX CO ti mym .
SFX CO ti mymi .
SFX CO eti ši .
SFX CO eti ša .
SFX CO eti še .
SFX CO eti ty .
SFX CO eti ta .
SFX CO eti to .
SFX CO eti tje .

SFX CP Y 2
SFX CP s m .
SFX CP s mi .

SFX CQ Y 27
SFX CQ y o .
SFX CQ y a .
SFX CQ y ogo .
SFX CQ y u .
SFX CQ y oj .
SFX CQ y om .
SFX CQ y omu .
SFX CQ 0 m .
SFX CQ y oju .
SFX CQ y i .
SFX CQ y e .
SFX CQ 0 h .
SFX CQ 0 mi .
SFX CQ ky čějši/zz .
SFX CQ ky čějšego .
SFX CQ ky čějšemu .
SFX CQ ky čějšim .
SFX CQ ky čějšem .
SFX CQ ky čějše .
SFX CQ ky čějša .
SFX CQ ky čějšu .
SFX CQ ky čějšej .
SFX CQ ky čějšeju .
SFX CQ ky čějših .
SFX CQ ky čějšim .
SFX CQ ky čějšimi .
SFX CQ ky čeje/zz .

SFX CR Y 69
SFX CR  se 0 .
SFX CR ti se l .
SFX CR ti se la .
SFX CR ti se lo .
SFX CR ti se li .
SFX CR iti se u .
SFX CR ti se m .
SFX CR ti se š .
SFX CR ti se 0 .
SFX CR ti se mo .
SFX CR i se e .
SFX CR iti se et .
SFX CR ti se h .
SFX CR ti se še .
SFX CR ti se hmo .
SFX CR ti se ste .
SFX CR ti se hu .
SFX CR iti se eči .
SFX CR iti se eča .
SFX CR iti se eče .
SFX CR ti se my .
SFX CR ti se mogo .
SFX CR ti se momu .
SFX CR ti se mym .
SFX CR ti se mom .
SFX CR ti se mo .
SFX CR ti se ma .
SFX CR ti se mu .
SFX CR ti se moj .
SFX CR ti se moju .
SFX CR ti se mi .
SFX CR ti se me .
SFX CR ti se myh .
SFX CR ti se mym .
SFX CR ti se mymi .
SFX CR ti se vši .
SFX CR ti se všego .
SFX CR ti se všemu .
SFX CR ti se všim .
SFX CR ti se všem .
SFX CR ti se vših .
SFX CR ti se všimi .
SFX CR ti se vša .
SFX CR ti se všu .
SFX CR ti se všej .
SFX CR ti se všeju .
SFX CR ti se vše .
SFX CR iti se eny .
SFX CR iti se enogo .
SFX CR iti se enomu .
SFX CR iti se enym .
SFX CR iti se enom .
SFX CR iti se eni .
SFX CR iti se ene .
SFX CR iti se enyh .
SFX CR iti se enymi .
SFX CR iti se ena .
SFX CR iti se enu .
SFX CR iti se enoj .
SFX CR iti se enoju .
SFX CR iti se eno .
SFX CR iti se enje .
SFX CR iti se enja .
SFX CR iti se enju .
SFX CR iti se enjem .
SFX CR iti se enij .
SFX CR iti se enjam .
SFX CR iti se enjami .
SFX CR iti se enjah .

SFX CS Y 80
SFX CS ti l .
SFX CS ti la .
SFX CS ti lo .
SFX CS ti li .
SFX CS skati šču .
SFX CS skati ščem .
SFX CS skati ščeš .
SFX CS skati šče .
SFX CS skati ščemo .
SFX CS skati ščete .
SFX CS skati ščut .
SFX CS ti h .
SFX CS ti še .
SFX CS ti hmo .
SFX CS ti ste .
SFX CS ti hu .
SFX CS skati šči .
SFX CS skati ščimo .
SFX CS skati ščite .
SFX CS skati ščuči .
SFX CS skati ščučego .
SFX CS skati ščučemu .
SFX CS skati ščučim .
SFX CS skati ščučem .
SFX CS skati ščučih .
SFX CS skati ščučimi .
SFX CS skati ščuča .
SFX CS skati ščuču .
SFX CS skati ščučej .
SFX CS skati ščučeju .
SFX CS skati ščuče .
SFX CS skati ščemy .
SFX CS skati ščemogo .
SFX CS skati ščemomu .
SFX CS skati ščemym .
SFX CS skati ščemom .
SFX CS skati ščemo .
SFX CS skati ščema .
SFX CS skati ščemu .
SFX CS skati ščemoj .
SFX CS skati ščemoju .
SFX CS skati ščemi .
SFX CS skati ščeme .
SFX CS skati ščemyh .
SFX CS skati ščemym .
SFX CS skati ščemymi .
SFX CS ti vši .
SFX CS ti všego .
SFX CS ti všemu .
SFX CS ti všim .
SFX CS ti všem .
SFX CS ti vših .
SFX CS ti všimi .
SFX CS ti vša .
SFX CS ti všu .
SFX CS ti všej .
SFX CS ti všeju .
SFX CS ti vše .
SFX CS ti ny .
SFX CS ti nogo .
SFX CS ti nomu .
SFX CS ti nym .
SFX CS ti nom .
SFX CS ti ni .
SFX CS ti ne .
SFX CS ti nyh .
SFX CS ti nymi .
SFX CS ti na .
SFX CS ti nu .
SFX CS ti noj .
SFX CS ti noju .
SFX CS ti no .
SFX CS ti nje .
SFX CS ti nja .
SFX CS ti nju .
SFX CS ti njem .
SFX CS ti nij .
SFX CS ti njam .
SFX CS ti njami .
SFX CS ti njah .

SFX CT Y 8
SFX CT a y .
SFX CT a u .
SFX CT a 0 .
SFX CT a ě .
SFX CT 0 h .
SFX CT 0 m .
SFX CT a oju .
SFX CT 0 mi .
