isv_lat_hunspell_dict.dic
mogti/CI
oves/CJ
moj/CK
mlěti/CL
kanja/CM
mgla/CN
umreti/CO
nas/CP
někaky/CQ
naučiti se/CR
ničij/CK
iskati/CS
nula/CT
svoj/CK
čij/CK
inočij/CK
svinja/CM
volja/CM
učiti se/CR
cibulja/CM
vaš/CK
kuhnja/CM
kapja/CM
močiti se/CR
naš/CK
studnja/CM
rolja/CM
pustynja/CM
pomogti/CI
tvoj/CK
zemja/CM
trgovja/CM
dynja/CM
pěsnja/CM
čerešnja/CM
čaplja/CM
večerja/CM
burja/CM
jednaky/CQ
něčij/CK
sěmja/CM
taky/CQ
nikaky/CQ
mužiti se/CR
omužiti se/CR
kupaljnja/CM
kulja/CM
kavarnja/CM
gorečnja/CM
kopaljnja/CM
treti/CO
hvilja/CM
trevožiti se/CR
lěčiljnja/CM
vsaky/CQ
čitaljnja/CM
prizemjiti se/CR
košulja/CM
strigti/CI
ostrigti/CI
molnja/CM
spaljnja/CM
gospodynja/CM
iztreti/CO
smlěti/CL
koj/CK
koj/CK
někoj/CK
izumreti/CO
sotnja/CM
ručiti se/CR
priučiti se/CR
točiti se/CR
cvekla/CN
čajiljnja/CM
četvrtina/CT
desetina/CT
družiti se/CR
gostiljnja/CM
inaky/CQ
knegynja/CM
konopja/CM
lobanja/CM
mučiljnja/CM
nedělja/CM
osmina/CT
ozemja/CM
petina/CT
podružiti se/CR
poručiti se/CR
sedmnadsetina/CT
tretina/CT
založiljnja/CM
zemja/CM
diky/CQ
najveliky/CQ
skaržiti se/CR
slučiti se/CR
osmnadsetina/CT
sědiljnja/CM
šestina/CT
sedmina/CT
devetina/CT
sotina/CT
stotina/CT
bronja/CM
kolikoraky/CQ
iziskati/CS
ostrěgti/CI
poiskati/CS
povrhnja/CM
sbližiti se/CR
skrinja/CM
višnja/CM
zaključiljnja/CM
zorja/CM
ovaky/CQ
onaky/CQ
koliky/CQ
seliky/CQ
toliky/CQ
ovoliky/CQ
onoliky/CQ
vseliky/CQ
inoliky/CQ
metla/CN
ovčarnja/CM
ulja/CM
legti/CI
legti/CI
mnogoraky/CQ
nalegti/CI
prěmogti/CI
složiti se/CR
mesarnja/CM
pekarnja/CM
razprja/CM
vpregti/CI
zapregti/CI
milja/CM
obrušiti se/CR
protreti/CO
zaručiti se/CR
strěgti/CI
nastražiti se/CR
tužiti se/CR
nevolja/CM
kukla/CN
nakovaljnja/CM
odključiti se/CR
fasolja/CM
čekaljnja/CM
skončiti se/CR
približiti se/CR
těšiti se/CR
banja/CM
bezruky/CQ
bližiti se/CR
dropja/CM
gnojiti se/CR
hodulja/CM
igumenja/CM
iznemogti/CI
jednoruky/CQ
jutrenja/CM
kovaljnja/CM
kupja/CM
kuznja/CM
laznja/CM
mračiti se/CR
mrščiti se/CR
natěšiti se/CR
natreti/CO
neveliky/CQ
obnažiti se/CR
obtreti/CO
odstrigti/CI
odtreti/CO
rabynja/CM
razmlěti/CL
raztreti/CO
smogti/CI
vaflja/CM
vanilja/CM
vikunja/CM
zamreti/CO
krošiti se/CR
kružiti se/CR
knigarnja/CM
lěvoruky/CQ
pravoruky/CQ
desnoruky/CQ
flotilja/CM
izpregti/CI
smrščiti se/CR
razmnožiti se/CR
izmogti/CI
gargulja/CM
utreti/CO
odklejiti se/CR
rojiti se/CR
pristrigti/CI
topolja/CM
milostynja/CM
ježiti se/CR
naježiti se/CR
monahynja/CM
susrědotočiti se/CR
čelja/CM
poněkoj/CK
vsekaky/CQ
iziskati/CS
pivovarnja/CM
ljutnja/CM
sablja/CM
soočiti se/CR
suočiti se/CR
plěvnja/CM
datulja/CM
faklja/CM
glavnja/CM
suknja/CM
skotobojnja/CM
dupja/CM
izlegti/CI
lěčiti se/CR
izlěčiti se/CR
nastrašiti se/CR
bezpokojiti se/CR
nepokojiti se/CR
marulja/CM
prilučiti se/CR
podključiti se/CR
